Utah statutes.
61-2f-201.   License required.
(1)  Unless a person is licensed under this chapter, it is unlawful for the
person to do the following with respect to real estate located in this state:
(a)  engage in the business of a principal broker, associate broker, or sales
agent;
(b)  act in the capacity of a principal broker, associate broker, or sales
agent;
(c)  advertise or assume to act as a principal broker, associate broker, or a
sales agent.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 61-2f-202, an individual is required to be
licensed as a principal broker, associate broker, or a sales agent if the
individual performs, offers to perform, or attempts to perform one act for
valuable consideration of:
(a)  buying, selling, leasing, managing, or exchanging real estate for another
person; or
(b)  offering for another person to buy, sell, lease, manage, or exchange real
estate.
